Maryland, session 2025, SB0821.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–403.
(a) (1) In cooperation with the State Board and the Maryland State Medical
Society, the Maryland Department of Health shall adopt rules and regulations regarding
blood tests for lead poisoning required of children entering schools.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0821*

SENATE BILL 821
(2) [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 7–403.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN
cooperation with the State Board and the Statewide Advisory Commission on
Immunizations, the Maryland Department of Health shall adopt rules and regulations
regarding immunizations required of children entering schools.
(3) These rules and regulations shall:
(i) Be adopted in compliance with the Administrative Procedure
Act;
(ii) Provide that any child may have the immunization administered
by his personal physician; and
(iii) 1. By September 2003, in areas designated as at risk for lead
poisoning, as determined under § 18–106 of the Health – General Article, when a child
enters a public prekindergarten program, kindergarten program, or first grade, require the
parent or legal guardian of the child to provide documentation from a health care provider,
on a form developed by the Maryland Department of Health, certifying that the child has
undergone blood testing for lead poisoning administered in accordance with the guidelines
of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in the screening of young children for
lead poisoning: Guidance for State and Local Public Health Officials (November 1997) and
any subsequent guidelines; and
2. By September 2003, require a program or school to report
the name, last known address, and telephone number of each child for whom certified
documentation of a lead test is not provided under item 1 of this item, as determined by
regulation, to the local health department in the jurisdiction where the child resides.
(4) Any requirement for the administration of pertussis vaccine shall be
consistent with § 18–332(b) of the Health – General Article.
7–403.1.
(A) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL TEMPORARILY ADMIT A STUDENT TO
SCHOOL IF THE STUDENT’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN IS UNABLE TO PROVIDE PROOF
OF IMMUNIZATION WITHIN THE TIME FRAME REQUIRED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED
UNDER § 7–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT GRANTED TEMPORARY
ADMISSION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL PRESENT EVIDENCE OF
THE STUDENT’S APPOINTMENT WITH A HEALTH PROFESSIONAL OR LOCAL HEALTH
DEPARTMENT TO:
(1) RECEIVE A REQUIRED IMMUNIZATION;
(2) RECONSTRUCT A LOST RECORD; OR

SENATE BILL 821 3
(3) ACQUIRE EVIDENCE OF AGE–APPROPRIATE IMMUNITY ON A FORM
PROVIDED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(C) THE DATE OF THE STUDENT’S APPOINTMENT WITH A HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL OR LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT MAY NOT EXCEED 60 CALENDAR
DAYS FROM THE DATE THE STUDENT IS GRANTED TEMPORARY ADMISSION.
(D) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A TEMPORARILY ADMITTED STUDENT
SHALL PROVIDE EVIDENCE OF THE STUDENT’S REQUIRED IMMUNIZATIONS ON THE
NEXT SCHOOL DAY FOLLOWING THE STUDENT’S APPOINTMENT WITH A HEALTH
PROFESSIONAL OR LOCAL HEALTH DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.